Ohio, session 136, HB71.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 1509.101 of the Revised Code be 6
enacted to read as follows: 7
Sec. 1509.101. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of the 8
Revised Code to the contrary, the owner of a horizontal well 9
that operates in or under a state park established under Chapter 10
1546. of the Revised Code shall disclose the trade name and all 11
chemical components of all products, fluids, and substances used 12
in the drilling and operation of the well to the chief of the 13
division of oil and gas resources management. The owner shall 14
disclose the trade name and chemical components not less than 15
thirty days prior to the use of any such product, fluid, or 16
substance. 17
(B) The chief shall immediately post the information the 18
chief receives under division (A) of this section on the 19

H. B. No. 71 Page 2
As Introduced
division of oil and gas resources management's web site. 20